Missouri, session 2026, HB3088.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1068, to read as follows:
376.1068. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Anti-steering clause", a provision in a provider network contract that
restricts the ability of a general contracting entity to encourage an enrollee to obtain a
health care service from a competitor of the provider, including offering incentives to
encourage enrollees to use specific providers;
(2) "Anti-tiering clause", a provision in a provider network contract that:
(a) Restricts the ability of a general contracting entity to introduce or modify a
tiered network plan or assign providers into tiers; or
(b) Requires a general contracting entity to place all members of a provider in
the same tier of a tiered network plan;
(3) "Covered individual", an individual who is covered under a health benefit
plan;
(4) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(5) "Facility", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(6) "Gag clause", a provision in a provider network contract that restricts the
ability of a general contracting entity or provider to disclose:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3088 2
(a) Price or quality information, including the allowed amount, negotiated rates
or discounts, fees for services, or other claim-related financial obligations included in
the contract, to a governmental entity as authorized by law or its contractors or agents,
an enrollee, a treating provider of an enrollee, a plan sponsor, or potential eligible
enrollees and plan sponsors; or
(b) Out-of-pocket costs to an enrollee;
(7) "General contracting entity", a person who enters into a direct contract with
a provider for the delivery of health care services to covered individuals regardless of
whether the person, in the ordinary course of business, establishes a provider network
for access by another party. The term "general contracting entity" shall not include a
health care provider or facility unless the provider or facility is entering into the
contract in the provider's or facility's role as a health benefit plan;
(8) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(9) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(10) "Most-favored-nation clause", a provision in a provider network contract
that:
(a) Prohibits or grants an option to prohibit:
a. A provider from contracting with another general contracting entity to
provide health care services at a lower rate; or
b. A general contracting entity from contracting with another provider to
provide health care services at a higher rate;
(b) Requires or grants an option to require:
a. A provider to accept a lower rate for health care services if the provider
agrees with another general contracting entity to accept a lower rate for the services; or
b. A general contracting entity to pay a higher rate for health care services if the
entity agrees with another provider to pay a higher rate for the services;
(c) Requires or grants an option to require termination or renegotiation of an
existing provider network contract if:
a. A provider agrees with another general contracting entity to accept a lower
rate for providing health care services; or
b. A general contracting entity agrees with a provider to pay a higher rate for
health care services; or
(d) Requires:
a. A provider to disclose the provider's contractual reimbursement rates with
other general contracting entities; or

HB 3088 3
b. A general contracting entity to disclose the general contracting entity's
contractual reimbursement rates with other providers;
(11) "Provider", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(12) "Provider network contract", a contract between a general contracting
entity and a provider for the delivery of, and payment for, health care services to a
covered individual.
2. A provider shall not:
(1) Offer to a general contracting entity a written provider network contract
that includes an anti-steering, anti-tiering, gag, or most-favored-nation clause;
(2) Enter into a provider network contract that includes an anti-steering, anti-
tiering, gag, or most-favored-nation clause; or
(3) Amend or renew an existing provider network contract previously entered
into with a general contracting entity so that the contract as amended or renewed adds
or retains an anti-steering, anti-tiering, gag, or most-favored-nation clause.
3. Any provision in a provider network contract that is an anti-steering, anti-
tiering, gag, or most-favored-nation clause is void and unenforceable. The remaining
provisions in the provider network contract shall remain in effect and are enforceable.
4. A health benefit plan issuer that encourages an enrollee to obtain a health care
service from a particular provider, including offering incentives to encourage enrollees
to use specific providers, or that introduces or modifies a tiered network plan or assigns
providers into tiers has a fiduciary duty to the enrollee or policyholder to engage in that
conduct only for the primary benefit of the enrollee or policyholder.
✔